Hawaii statutes.
[§23-92] Review for 2019 and every
fifth year thereafter. (a) The credits under the income tax and financial
institutions tax listed in subsection (c) shall be reviewed in 2019 and every
fifth year thereafter.

(b) The auditor shall submit the findings and
recommendations of the reviews to the legislature and governor at least twenty
days prior to the convening of the immediately following regular session.

(c) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Sections 235-12.5 and 241-4.6--Credit for renewable
energy technology system installed and placed in service in the State. For the
purpose of section 23-91(b)(5), this credit shall be deemed to have been
enacted for an economic benefit; and

(2) Section 235-17--Credit for qualified production
costs incurred for a qualified motion picture, digital media, or film
production. [L 2016, c 245, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next